North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 24. Miscellaneous Transitional Provisions.

§ 113-316.
General statement of purpose and effect of revisions of Subchapter IV made in 1965 and 1979.

To clarify the conservation laws of the State and the authority and jurisdiction of the Department and the North Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission: commercial fishing waters are renamed coastal fishing waters and the Department is given jurisdiction over and responsibility for the marine and estuarine resources in coastal fishing waters; the laws pertaining to commercial fishing operations and marine fishing and fisheries regulated by the Department are consolidated and revised generally and broadened to reflect the jurisdictional change respecting coastal fisheries; laws relating to the conservation of wildlife resources administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission are consolidated and revised; and the enforcement authority of marine fisheries inspectors and wildlife protectors is clarified, including the authority of wildlife protectors over boating and other activities other than conservation within the jurisdiction of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

History.

1965, c. 957, s. 1; 1973, c. 1262, ss. 28, 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, s. 117.

§ 113-317.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

Cross References.

For repealed sections and local acts continued in effect as to particular counties by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, see

G.S. 113-133.1

.

§§ 113-318 through 113-320.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 28.

§§ 113-321,
113-322.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

Cross References.

For repealed sections and local acts continued in effect as to particular counties, see

G.S. 113-133.1

.

§§ 113-323 through 113-330.

Reserved for future codification purposes.